Florida, session 2026, HB1339.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 627.64192, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
627.64192 Required coverage for imaging and genetic
testing for cancer risk.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Cost-sharing requirement" means an insured's
deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any similar out-of-pocket
expense.
(b) "Evidence-based cancer imaging" means imaging
techniques used for detecting cancer and guiding treatment which
are in accordance with the most recent versions of the National
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1339-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1339 2026
Comprehensive Cancer Network clinical practice guidelines.
(c) "Genetic testing for hereditary cancer risk" means
germline multigene testing for an inherited mutation associated
with an increased risk of cancer in accordance with evidence-
based clinical practice guidelines.
(2) A health insurance policy that is delivered, issued
for delivery, renewed, amended, or continued in this state and
that provides major medical or similar comprehensive coverage
must provide coverage for:
(a) Genetic testing for hereditary cancer risk for an
individual with a personal or family history of cancer which is
recommended by a health care professional; and
(b) Evidence-based cancer imaging for an individual with
an increased risk of cancer as recommended by the National
Comprehensive Cancer Network clinical practice guidelines.
(3) The coverage required under subsection (2) is not
subject to any cost-sharing requirement.
Section 2. Section 627.66912, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
627.66912 Required coverage for imaging and genetic
testing for cancer risk.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Cost-sharing requirement" means an insured's
deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any similar out-of-pocket
expense.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1339-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1339 2026
(b) "Evidence-based cancer imaging" means imaging
techniques used for detecting cancer and guiding treatment which
are in accordance with the most recent versions of the National
Comprehensive Cancer Network clinical practice guidelines.
(c) "Genetic testing for hereditary cancer risk" means
germline multigene testing for an inherited mutation associated
with an increased risk of cancer in accordance with evidence-
based clinical practice guidelines.
(2) A group, blanket, or franchise health insurance policy
that is delivered, issued for delivery, renewed, amended, or
continued in this state and that provides major medical or
similar comprehensive coverage must provide coverage for:
(a) Genetic testing for hereditary cancer risk for an
individual with a personal or family history of cancer which is
recommended by a health care professional; and
(b) Evidence-based cancer imaging for an individual with
an increased risk of cancer as recommended by the National
Comprehensive Cancer Network clinical practice guidelines.
(3) The coverage required under subsection (2) is not
subject to any cost-sharing requirement.
Section 3. Section 641.31078, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
641.31078 Required coverage for cancer imaging and genetic
testing for cancer risk.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1339-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1339 2026
(a) "Cost-sharing requirement" means a subscriber's
deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any similar out-of-pocket
expense.
(b) "Evidence-based cancer imaging" means imaging
techniques used for detecting cancer and guiding treatment which
are in accordance with the most recent versions of the National
Comprehensive Cancer Network clinical practice guidelines.
(c) "Genetic testing for hereditary cancer risk" means
germline multigene testing for an inherited mutation associated
with an increased risk of cancer in accordance with evidence-
based clinical practice guidelines.
(2) A health maintenance contract that is delivered,
issued for delivery, renewed, amended, or continued in this
state and that provides major medical or similar comprehensive
coverage must provide coverage for:
(a) Genetic testing for hereditary cancer risk for an
individual with a personal or family history of cancer which is
recommended by a health care professional; and
(b) Evidence-based cancer imaging for an individual with
an increased risk of cancer as recommended by the National
Comprehensive Cancer Network clinical practice guidelines.
(3) The coverage required under subsection (2) is not
subject to any cost-sharing requirement.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1339-00